hunspell/kpv/komi.dic
веськыд/A1O1O2O3G7G8
виж/A1O1O2O3G7
горш/A1O1O2O3G7
гырысь/A1O1O2O3G7G8
джуджыд/A1O1O2O3G7G8
еджыд/A1O1O2O3G7
зумыд/A1O1O2O3G7G8
ичӧтик/A1O1O2O3G7
кузь/A1O1O2O3G7G8
кыз/A1O1O2O3G7G8
лӧсьыд/A1O1O2O3G7G8
мелі/A1O1O2O3G7
пушыд/A1O1O2O3G7
смел/A1O1O2O3G7G8
удал/A1O1O2O3G7
чорыд/A1O1O2O3G7G8
вевтыр/A1O1O2O3
авъя/A2O1O2O3
бовкъя/A2O1O2O3
гӧгъя/A2O1O2O3
идъя/A2O1O2O3
ловъя/A2O1O2O3
неловъя/A2O1O2O3
пешкыля/A2O1O2O3
сьӧлаозъя/A2O1O2O3
чукъя/A2O1O2O3
важсяма/A3O1O2O3
грӧша/A3O1O2O3
кепыся/A3O1O2O3
лӧза/A3O1O2O3
неногса/A3O1O2O3
паркаа/A3O1O2O3
рӧщӧта/A3O1O2O3
торъямога/A3O1O2O3
шӧрта/A3O1O2O3
сабляӧсь/A4O1O2O3
солӧсь/A4O1O2O3
гӧрӧдӧсь/A4O1O2O3
кодзулӧсь/A4O1O2O3
муткырӧсь/A4O1O2O3
пызьӧсь/A4O1O2O3
табакӧсь/A4O1O2O3
чуркйӧсь/A4O1O2O3
какӧсь/A4O1O2O3
вильыдкодь/A5O1O2O3
дубыдкодь/A5O1O2O3
ичӧткодь/A5O1O2O3
кызкодь/A5O1O2O3
мӧдкодь/A5O1O2O3
ӧткодькодь/A5O1O2O3
рыжӧйкодь/A5O1O2O3
тӧдсакодь/A5O1O2O3
чорыдкодь/A5O1O2O3
базадінса/A6O1O2O3
галписа/A6O1O2O3
караса/A6O1O2O3
лопъюса/A6O1O2O3
отса/A6O1O2O3
сісьтыдінса/A6O1O2O3
хакасияса/A6O1O2O3
шипиловкаса/A6O1O2O3
устьсысольскса/A6O1O2O3
чойувса/A7O1O2O3
стынпельӧсса/A7O1O2O3
гӧракостъясса/A7O1O2O3
войнаводзвывса/A7O1O2O3
йирса/A7O1O2O3
медвылысса/A7O1O2O3
первомайводзвывса/A7O1O2O3
ставйӧзса/A7O1O2O3
ыбдорса/A7O1O2O3
батьтӧм-мамтӧм/A8O1O2O3
вӧрастӧм/A8O1O2O3
деньгатӧм/A8O1O2O3
кӧвтӧм/A8O1O2O3
лыдтӧм-тшӧттӧм/A8O1O2O3
мутӧм/A8O1O2O3
пӧктӧм/A8O1O2O3
терпенньӧтӧм/A8O1O2O3
дзирыдтӧм/A8O1O2O3
праздникъясдырся/A9O1O2O3
асывся/A9O1O2O3
векися/A9O1O2O3
войнадырся/A9O1O2O3
дыркадся/A9O1O2O3
лунбыдся/A9O1O2O3
нэмкежся/A9O1O2O3
рӧштводырся/A9O1O2O3
тӧлысьчӧжся/A9O1O2O3
вомӧн/B1
катчӧс/B1
кодя/B1
кындзи/B1
ногӧн/B1
ӧтдор/B1
пуд/B1
сор/B1
чӧжӧн/B1
кодь/B2O1O2O3A1
выйна/B3O1O2O3A1
гырся/B3O1O2O3A1
дыра/B3O1O2O3A1
кузьта/B3O1O2O3A1
кузяла/B3O1O2O3A1
кызта/B3O1O2O3A1
мындышта/B3O1O2O3A1
пыдна/B3O1O2O3A1
сьӧкта/B3O1O2O3A1
быттьӧнӧкӧ/C1
зато/C1
кӧ/C1
коли/C1
лёка/C1
мед/C1
нежӧ/C1
сідзжӧ/C1
то/C1
мӧдарног/D1
гожӧмбыд/D1
челядьдырйи/D1
сідзик/D1
прекӧ/D1
непременнӧ/D1
интелектуальнӧ/D1
ӧкурат/D1
нивӧю/D1
выльвылысь/D2
кынвылысь/D2
мудзӧмйылысь/D2
ӧдӧбйылысь/D2
скӧрвылысь/D2
томвылысь/D2
шогвылысь/D2
доймӧмйылысь/D2
нетшыштчӧмпырысь/D3
гӧляпырысь/D3
дэльӧдӧмпырысь/D3
косапырысь/D3
надеяпырысь/D3
повзьӧмпырысь/D3
тірӧдӧмпырысь/D3
шудапырысь/D3
аршынӧн-джынйӧн/D4
воӧн-джынйӧн/D4
километрӧн-джынйӧн/D4
лунӧн-джынйӧн/D4
нэмйӧн-джынйӧн/D4
стӧканӧн-джынйӧн/D4
тысячаӧн-джынйӧн/D4
джынйӧн/D4
рӧмыдсорӧн/D5
сьылансорӧн/D5
ворсӧмсорӧн/D5
ылӧдчӧмсорӧн/D5
тірӧмсорӧн/D5
нюмъёвтӧмсорӧн/D5
шмонитӧмсорӧн/D5
котӧрӧн-сорӧн/D5
унаӧн/D6
шыргӧрӧдӧн/D6
гозйӧн/D6
гартолӧн/D6
копырӧн/D6
гатшӧн/D6
мырдысьӧн/D6
акакаӧн/D6
буркузя/D7
гежӧда/D7
зумыда/D7
лӧсьыда/D7
нелӧсьыда/D7
прӧстӧя/D7
тшӧтшыда/D7
ыткӧба/D7
бус-тшын/D8
водзысянь/D8
йӧзысь-мортысь/D8
кытчӧ/D8
мӧдарсянь/D8
нелёкысь/D8
пытшкӧ/D8
тшыгвылӧ/D8
водзкодь/D9
вылынкодь/D9
ёсякодь/D9
косакодь/D9
матынкодь/D9
поводнӧякодь/D9
стӧчакодь/D9
чорыдакодь/D9
аминь/E1
деливӧ/E1
жалькодь/E1
йирмӧг/E1
манлив/E1
окота/E1
сӧвестнӧ/E1
неяснӧ/E1
Абдуллаев/F1O7O8O9
Вдовенко/F1O7O8O9
Жиляев/F1O7O8O9
Кулага/F1O7O8O9
Нижник/F1O7O8O9
Сахар/F1O7O8O9
Хара/F1O7O8O9
Мыров/F1O7O8O9
Ӧпӧнась/F2O7O8O9
Василь/F2O7O8O9
Евгень/F2O7O8O9
Кирьян-Варьян/F2O7O8O9
Мартьӧ/F2O7O8O9
Ӧкулик/F2O7O8O9
Сиверьян/F2O7O8O9
Гулька/F2O7O8O9
Хабиб/F3O7O8O9
Анпадист/F3O7O8O9
Ванда/F3O7O8O9
Иезекииль/F3O7O8O9
Микуш/F3O7O8O9
Северина/F3O7O8O9
Эрик/F3O7O8O9
Фредерика/F3O7O8O9
Кӧзлов/F4O7O8O9
Убойца/F4O7O8O9
Ӧдӧким/F4O7O8O9
Грознӧй/F4O7O8O9
Перикола/F4O7O8O9
Гар-Марей/F4O7O8O9
Портяк/F4O7O8O9
Кропля/F4O7O8O9
Сысӧевич/F5O7O8O9
Аронович/F5O7O8O9
Дементьевич/F5O7O8O9
Климентьевич/F5O7O8O9
Никитьевич/F5O7O8O9
Салтанович/F5O7O8O9
Эрихович/F5O7O8O9
Януарьевич/F5O7O8O9
Найдик/F6O7O8O9# (пон)
Стрекотуха/F6O7O8O9
Бурьянушко/F6O7O8O9
Джерри/F6O7O8O9
Манька/F6O7O8O9
петрӧван/F6O7O8O9
Биа-серъя/F6O7O8O9
Шаричок/F6O7O8O9
Чахкля/F7O7O8
Фата-Моргана/F7O7O8
Бурмат/F7O7O8
Йетти/F7O7O8
Медуница/F7O7O8
Рымда/F7O7O8
Арӧй-дрӧй/F7O7O8
Тысъя/F7O7O8# яран-багатыр
Ёгорика/F8O7O8
Падеика/F8O7O8
Мишика/F8O7O8
Локутиха/F8O7O8
Пызичиха/F8O7O8
Бабариха/F8O7O8
Ворониха/F8O7O8
Пшечиниха/F8O7O8
Изосимка/F9O7O8
Ефремко/F9O7O8
Малец/F9O7O8
Осипко/F9O7O8
Тренька/F9O7O8
Гераклит/F9O7O8
Эсхин/F9O7O8
Матфан/F9O7O8
эге-е/I1
а-а/I1
ка-ка-ка/I1
на/I1
ӧввӧ/I1
тёгӧть/I1
фу/I1
ы-ы/I1
ых-ы/I1
хо-оок/I2
тпрусь-тпрусь/I2
коо-коо/I2
н-но/I2
пиль-пиль/I2
тӧлӧ/I2
цип-цип-цип/I2
шыть/I2
Бенфика/J1O7O8O9O5O6
Главчермет/J1O7O8O5O6
Изьвалеспром/J1O7O8O5O6
Комистройсервис/J1O7O8O5O6
Милано/J1O7O8O9O5O6
Праксис/J1O7O8O5O6
Северолес/J1O7O8O5O6
Татнефть/J1O7O8O9O5O6
госжилинспекция/J2O7O8O9O5O6
завком/J2O7O8O9O5O6
минкомсвязи/J2O7O8O9O5O6
минэкономика/J2O7O8O9O5O6
облполитпросвет/J2O7O8O9O5O6
райкомпарт/J2O7O8O9O5O6
ространснадзор/J2O7O8O9O5O6
ЦеКа/J2O7O8O9O5O6
берлихинген/J3O7O8O9O5O6
казанка/J3O7O8O9O5O6# пыж
Родопи/J3O7O8O9O5O6
шкода/J3O7O8O9O5O6
смитвиссон/J3O7O8O9O5O6# gun
Хатсусе/J3O7O8O9O5O6# ship
Катеро/J3O7O8O9O5O6
Якума/J3O7O8O9O5O6
Тиньёль/J4O7O8O5O6# festival
Борба/J4O7O8O5O6
ЛитКлуб/J4O7O8O5O6
Москвитянин/J4O7O8O5O6
Ридду-ридду/J4O7O8O5O6
Узы-боры/J4O7O8O5O6
Рамаяна/J4O7O8O5O6
дунне/J4O7O8O5O6# Удмурт ~
обтирочнӧй/R4A1O1O2O3
ботаническӧй/R4A1O1O2O3
доильнӧй/R4A1O1O2O3
корыстнӧй/R4A1O1O2O3
неблагоприятнӧй/R4A1O1O2O3
русификаторскӧй/R4A1O1O2O3
локальнӧй/R5A1O1O2O3
тартускӧй/R6A1O1O2O3
эмышт/Y2G2G3
